North Carolina statutes. Chapter 37A. Uniform Principal and Income Act.
Article 6. Miscellaneous Provisions. [Repealed]

§ 37A-6-601.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this Chapter, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History.

2003-232, s. 2.

§ 37A-6-602.
Severability clause.

If any provision of this Chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this Chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this Chapter are severable.

History.

2003-232, s. 2.